Nebraska, session 109, LB57.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB57 LB57
2025 2025
Section 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate (1)
$7,926,576 for FY2025-26 ($3,345,808 General Funds and $4,580,768 Federal
Funds) and (2) $8,243,639 for FY2026-27 ($3,479,640 General Funds and
$4,763,999 Federal Funds) to the Department of Health and Human Services
for medicaid assisted-living facility rates for Program 348, to be used
specifically by the department to increase the current medicaid assisted-
living facility rates, which are included in Program No. 348 and paid as
a service as part of Nebraska's aged and disabled home and community-
based medicaid 1915(c) waiver program, to the daily rate of $88.24 for
FY2025-26 and $91.78 for FY2026-27, for both rural and urban assisted-
living waiver days.
-2-